Colorado, session 2026A, HB1151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of corrections for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part II as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART II
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) MANAGEMENT
(A) Executive Director's Office Subprogram
Personal Services 5,119,487 4,875,682 243,805a
(42.0 FTE) (4.0 FTE)
Restorative Justice Program
with Victim-Offender
Dialogues in Department
Facilities 75,000 75,000
(1.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 86,488,753 85,276,960 1,211,793b
88,748,979 87,502,118 1,246,861b
Short-term Disability 305,745 301,791 3,954b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 2,022,137 1,996,453 25,684b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 44,373,237 43,808,406 564,831b
Salary Survey 12,444,682 12,289,437 155,245b
Step Pay 2,965,421 2,940,413 25,008b
PERA Direct Distribution 9,667,386 9,546,194 121,192b
Overtime 33,313,135 33,313,135
Incentives and Bonuses 5,541,726 5,541,726
Shift Differential 22,273,865 22,243,777 30,088b
Workers' Compensation 7,995,368 7,813,873 181,495b
Operating Expenses 411,709 321,709 5,000a 85,000(I)c
Legal Services 3,735,644d 3,651,444 84,200b
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 11,668,124 11,403,258 264,866b
Leased Space 6,805,610 6,621,708 183,902b
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payments 659,571 659,571
Planning and Analysis
Contracts 82,410 82,410
Payments to District
Attorneys 681,102 681,102
Payments to Coroners 32,175 32,175
Digital Trunk Radio Payments 2,535,420 2,535,420
ADDITIONAL PRISON
CAPACITY - PERSONAL
SERVICES 1,367,765 1,367,765
ADDITIONAL PRISON
CAPACITY - OPERATING
EXPENSES 502,859 502,859
ADDITIONAL PRISON
CAPACITY - FACILITY
START-UP 288,742 288,742
ADDITIONAL PRISON
CAPACITY - PERSONNEL
START-UP 201,055 201,055
259,197,707
263,818,354
a These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety from the State Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Program line item appropriation in the Victims
Assistance section of the Division of Criminal Justice. These amounts originate as cash funds from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506
(1), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $2,149,751 $2,176,543 is from sales revenues earned by Correctional Industries, an estimated $685,199 $693,475 is from sales revenues earned by the
Canteen Operation, and $17,308 shall be from the Broadband Infrastructure Cash Fund created in Section 17-1-168 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c This amount shall be from the Social Security Administration Incentive Payment Memorandum of Understanding.
d Of this amount, $3,714,898 shall be used to purchase legal services from the Department of Law and $20,746 shall be used to contract for legal services from private firms for
litigation related to the Rifle Correctional Center.
(B) External Capacity Subprogram
(1) Private Prison Monitoring Unit
Personal Services 1,139,368 1,139,368
(12.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 183,443 153,976 29,467a
1,322,811
a This amount shall be from revenues earned from monitoring private Colorado prisons that house out-of-state offenders.
(2) Payments to House State Prisoners6
Payments to local jails at a
rate of $77.16 per inmate per
day 7,406,975 7,406,975
10,738,785 10,738,785
Payments to in-state private
prisons at a rate of $66.52 per
inmate per day 71,722,529 68,829,143 2,893,386a
74,501,003 71,607,617
Inmate Education and Benefit
Programs at In-state Private
Prisons 541,566 541,566
79,671,070
85,781,354
a This amount shall be from the State Criminal Alien Assistance Program Cash Fund created in Section 17-1-107.5 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Inspector General Subprogram
Personal Services 5,338,153 5,231,920 106,233a
(50.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 473,922 390,735 83,187a
Inspector General Grants 207,912 207,912(I)
6,019,987
a These amounts shall be from revenues earned from private prison out of state offender investigations.
346,211,575
356,942,506
(2) INSTITUTIONS
(A) Utilities Subprogram
Personal Services 396,312 396,312
(3.0 FTE)
Core Utilities7 21,490,472 20,000,000 1,490,472a
Energy Conservation and
Operating Expenses7 4,227,975 4,227,975
26,114,759
a This amount shall be from sales revenues earned by Correctional Industries.
(B) Maintenance Subprogram
Personal Services 25,274,817 25,274,817
(293.2 FTE)
(293.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 11,138,111 11,138,111
Broadband Installation 4,482,661 4,482,661a
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Maintenance Pueblo Campus 3,023,427 3,023,427
43,919,016
a This amount shall be from the Broadband Infrastructure Cash Fund created in Section 17-1-168 (1), C.R.S.
(C) Housing and Security Subprogram
Personal Services 211,487,305 211,487,305
(3,038.8 FTE)
(3,050.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,128,842 2,128,842
213,616,147
(D) Food Service Subprogram
Personal Services 22,409,896 22,409,896
(318.8 FTE)
(319.1 FTE)
Operating Expenses 21,703,298 21,703,298
22,323,769 22,323,769
Food Service Pueblo Campus 3,210,975 3,210,975
47,324,169
47,944,640
(E) Medical Services Subprogram8
Personal Services 49,380,661 49,058,572 322,089a
(409.2 FTE) (3.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,650,854 2,650,854
Purchase of Pharmaceuticals 17,897,763 17,897,763
21,373,778 21,373,778
Hepatitis C Treatment Costs 10,992,267 10,992,267
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
External Medical Services 65,374,875 65,374,875
74,416,498 74,416,498
Transgender Healthcare 5,317,500 5,317,500
1,636,400 1,636,400
Service Contracts 2,745,978 2,745,978
12,515,757 12,515,757
Indirect Cost Assessment 772 772a
154,360,670
172,966,987
a These amounts shall be from inmate medical fees collected pursuant to Section 17-1-113 (2), C.R.S.
(F) Laundry Subprogram
Personal Services 3,078,555 3,078,555
(38.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,442,923 2,442,923
5,521,478
(G) Superintendents Subprogram
Personal Services 14,148,833 14,148,833
(168.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 6,054,207 6,054,207
Inmate Telephone Calls 1,434,634 1,434,634
1,467,149 1,467,149
Dress Out 1,006,280 1,006,280
606,280 606,280
Start-up costs 2,050 2,050
22,646,004
22,278,519
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(H) Youthful Offender System Subprogram
Personal Services 13,278,618 13,278,618
(162.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 607,455 607,455
Contract Services 28,820 28,820
Maintenance and Food
Service 1,330,967 1,330,967
15,245,860
(I) Case Management Subprogram
Personal Services 20,526,974 20,526,974
(244.7 FTE)
(246.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 178,791 178,791
Offender ID Program 367,884 367,884
21,073,649
(J) Mental Health Subprogram
Personal Services 14,816,164 14,816,164
(168.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 331,766 331,766
Medical Contract Services 6,530,649 6,530,649
6,777,166 6,777,166
21,678,579
21,925,096
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(K) Inmate Pay Subprogram 5,099,947 5,099,947
(L) Legal Access Subprogram
Personal Services 1,964,751 1,964,751
(27.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 803,777 803,777
Contract Services 70,905 70,905
2,839,433
579,439,711
598,545,531
(3) SUPPORT SERVICES
(A) Business Operations Subprogram
Personal Services 7,682,295 6,716,550 56,609a 909,136b
(90.8 FTE) (13.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 231,951 231,951
Business Operations Grants 2,500,000 2,500,000(I)
Indirect Cost Assessment 415,746 415,746(I)
10,829,992
a This amount shall be from restitution collected pursuant to Section 16-18.5-109 (3), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $710,061 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $199,075 shall
be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
(B) Personnel Subprogram
Personal Services 2,450,773 2,450,773
(32.3 FTE)
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Operating Expenses 438,461 438,461
2,889,234
(C) Offender Services Subprogram
Personal Services 3,774,639 3,774,639
(44.1 FTE)
Operating Expenses 239,367 239,367
4,014,006
(D) Communications Subprogram
Operating Expenses 1,688,024 1,688,024
Dispatch Services 328,510 328,510
2,016,534
(E) Transportation Subprogram
Personal Services 2,682,955 2,682,955
(41.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 483,538 483,538
Vehicle Lease Payments 4,568,540 3,897,297 671,243a
4,306,893 3,659,055 647,838a
7,735,033
7,473,386
a Of this amount, an estimated $567,168 $554,015 is from sales revenues earned by Correctional Industries and an estimated $104,075 $93,823 is from sales revenues earned by the
Canteen Operation.
(F) Training Subprogram
Personal Services 2,756,826 2,756,826
(33.0 FTE)
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Operating Expenses 2,841,284 2,841,284
5,598,110
(G) Information Systems Subprogram
Operating Expenses 1,403,409 1,403,409
Payments to OIT 35,065,379 34,918,724 146,655a
34,535,208 34,400,164 135,044a
CORE Operations 72,316 65,447 3,499a 3,370b
36,541,104
36,010,933
a Of these amounts, an estimated $115,775 $106,904 is from Correctional Industries sales to non-state entities and an estimated $34,379 $31,639 is from sales revenues earned by the
Canteen Operation.
b This amount shall be from Correctional Industries sales to other state agencies.
(H) Facility Services Subprogram
Personal Services 1,474,278 1,474,278
(16.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 94,413 94,413
Start-up costs 1,000 1,000
1,569,691
71,193,704
70,401,886
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) INMATE PROGRAMS
(A) Labor Subprogram
Personal Services 6,052,312 6,052,312
(75.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 88,017 88,017
6,140,329
(B) Education Subprogram
Personal Services 16,530,768 16,530,768
(193.5 FTE)
(194.3 FTE)
Operating Expenses 4,396,924 2,850,944 1,257,065a 288,915b
Contract Services 1,221,428 1,221,428
Education Grants 80,060 10,000c 42,410d 27,650(I)
(2.0 FTE)
22,229,180
a Of this amount, an estimated $726,707 is from sales revenues earned by the Canteen Operation and an estimated $530,358 is from sales revenues earned by vocational programs.
b This amount shall be from sales revenues earned by vocational programs for products and services sold to other government agencies.
c This amount shall be from gifts, grants, and donations.
d This amount shall be from the Colorado Department of Education from special education funds.
(C) Recreation Subprogram
Personal Services 8,732,328 8,732,328
(119.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 77,552 77,552a
8,809,880
a This amount shall be from sales revenues earned by the Canteen Operation.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(D) Drug and Alcohol Treatment Subprogram
Personal Services 6,871,911 6,871,911
(87.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 117,884 117,884
Contract Services 2,312,251 2,312,251
Treatment Grants 126,682 126,682a
9,428,728
a This amount shall be from grant funds appropriated to the Division of Criminal Justice in the Department of Public Safety.
(E) Sex Offender Treatment Subprogram
Personal Services 3,860,164 3,828,930 31,234a
(55.8 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 92,276 91,776 500a
Polygraph Testing 242,500 242,500
Sex Offender Treatment
Grants 65,597 65,597(I)
4,260,537
a These amounts shall be from the Sex Offender Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-21-103 (3), C.R.S.
(F) Volunteers Subprogram
Personal Services 546,043 546,043
(8.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 17,912 17,912
563,955
51,432,609
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(5) COMMUNITY SERVICES
(A) Parole Subprogram
Personal Services 24,154,269 24,154,269
(326.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,875,425 2,875,425
Parolee Supervision and
Support Services 8,911,261 4,847,969 4,063,292a
Wrap-Around Services
Program 1,822,869 1,822,869
Insurance Payments 25,000 25,000
Grants to Community-based
Organizations for Parolee
Support 7,176,734 7,176,734
Community-based
Organizations Housing
Support 500,000 500,000
Parolee Housing Support 500,000 500,000
45,965,558
a This amount shall be transferred from the Judicial Department from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Expenditures line item appropriation in the Probation and Related Services
section.
(B) Community Supervision Subprogram
(1) Community Supervision
Personal Services 4,979,435 4,979,435
(48.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 505,042 505,042
Psychotropic Medication 31,400 31,400
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Community Supervision
Support Services 2,394,092 2,353,744 40,348a
7,909,969
a This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety, Division of Criminal Justice, Offender Treatment and Services.
(2) Youthful Offender System Aftercare
Personal Services 643,692
(8.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 141,067
Contract Services 897,584
1,682,343 1,682,343
(C) Community Re-entry Subprogram
Personal Services 3,046,885 3,046,885
(42.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 146,702 146,702
Offender Emergency
Assistance 96,768 96,768
Contract Services 190,000 190,000
Offender Re-employment
Center 100,000 100,000
Community Reintegration
Grants 39,098 39,098(I)
(1.0 FTE)
3,619,453
59,177,323
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(6) PAROLE BOARD
Personal Services 2,101,133 2,101,133
(20.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 107,890 107,890
Contract Services 242,437 242,437
Administrative and IT
Support 187,236 187,236
(2.0 FTE)
2,638,696
(7) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
Personal Services 12,879,733 5,053,878a 7,825,855b
8,209,428 3,221,297a 4,988,131b
(4.1 FTE) (102.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 5,846,798 1,546,956a 4,299,842b
7,196,335 1,904,019a 5,292,316b
Raw Materials 30,547,207 6,055,860a 24,491,347b
16,953,458 3,360,954a 13,592,504b
Inmate Pay 2,750,000 1,114,590a 1,635,410b
3,766,231 1,526,474a 2,239,757b
Capital Outlay 1,219,310 309,259a 910,051b
Indirect Cost Assessment 388,282 109,224a 279,058b
53,631,330
37,733,044
a Of these amounts, an estimated $14,039,767 $10,281,227 is from sales revenues earned by Correctional Industries and an estimated $150,000 is from rents and royalties earned on
Penitentiary Trust land managed by the State Board of Land Commissioners pursuant to Section 36-1-116 (2), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $25,015,845 $12,876,099 is from sales to other state agencies and an estimated $14,425,718 is from the Department of Revenue for the purchase of
license plates.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(8) CANTEEN OPERATION
Personal Services 2,761,622
(33.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 18,930,041
Inmate Pay 73,626
Indirect Cost Assessment 104,619
21,869,908 21,869,908(I)a
a This amount shall be from sales revenues earned by the Canteen Operation and is continuously appropriated to the division pursuant to Section 17-24-126 (1), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART II
(CORRECTIONS) $1,185,594,856 $1,086,514,775 $50,574,557a $45,164,521 $3,341,003b
$1,198,741,503 $1,115,559,656 $46,816,069a $33,024,775
a Of this amount, $23,500,633 $23,495,917 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
6 Department of Corrections, Management, External Capacity Subprogram, Payments to House State Prisoners -- In addition to the transfer authority provided
in section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the department of corrections is authorized to transfer up to 1.0 percent of the total appropriation for external capacity subprogram
between line items in the external capacity subprogram for purposes of reimbursing local jails, private prison providers, and community corrections providers.
7 Department of Corrections, Institutions, Utilities Subprogram, Core Utilities; Energy Conservation and Operating Expenses -- In addition to the transfer
authority provided in section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the department of corrections is authorized to transfer money from the Energy Conservation and Operating
Expenses line item to the Core Utilities line item.
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
8 Department of Corrections, Institutions, Medical Services Subprogram-- In addition to the transfer authority provided in section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the
department of corrections is authorized to transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriation for purchase of pharmaceuticals, Hepatitis C treatment costs,
and external medical services between those line items for the purposes of providing pharmaceuticals, Hepatitis C Treatments, and external medical services
for inmates.
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter 519, (HB
24-1430), amend Part II (1)(A), (1)(B)(2), and the affected totals as Part II (1)(A), (1)(B)(2), and the affected totals are amended by section 1 of chapter 452, (SB 25-089), and as Part
II (1)(A) and the affected totals are amended by section 6 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), Session Laws of Colorado 2025, as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART II
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) MANAGEMENT
(A) Executive Director's Office Subprogram
Personal Services 4,794,793 4,550,988 243,805a
(41.9 FTE) (4.0 FTE)
Restorative Justice Program
with Victim-Offender
Dialogues in Department
Facilities 75,000 75,000
(1.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 81,140,223 79,867,805 1,272,418b
Short-term Disability 553,570 544,141 9,429b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 1,945,054 1,916,767 28,287b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 43,203,931 42,575,335 628,596b
47,288,686 46,660,090
Salary Survey6 24,791,715 24,428,432 363,283b
Step Pay 16,431,610 16,275,915 155,695b
PERA Direct Distribution 8,837,393 8,695,905 141,488b
Overtime 35,340,753 35,340,753
Incentives and Bonuses7 14,334,002 14,334,002
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Shift Differential 17,982,314 17,949,518 32,796b
21,272,967 21,240,171
Temporary Employees
Related to Authorized
Leave 2,025,459 2,025,459
Workers' Compensation 7,584,883 7,412,706 172,177b
Operating Expenses 416,761 326,761 5,000a 85,000(I)c
Legal Services 3,893,252d 3,802,219 91,033b
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 9,318,427 9,106,899 211,528b
Leased Space 6,516,921 6,339,596 177,325b
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payments 659,571 659,571
Planning and Analysis
Contracts 82,410 82,410
Payments to District
Attorneys 681,102 681,102
Payments to Coroners 32,175 32,175
Digital Trunk Radio Payments 2,638,440 2,638,440
283,279,759
290,655,167
a These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety from the State Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Program line item appropriation in the Victims
Assistance section of the Division of Criminal Justice. These amounts originate as cash funds from the Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Fund created in Section 24-33.5-506
(1), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, an estimated $2,540,656 shall be from sales revenues earned by Correctional Industries and an estimated $743,399 shall be from sales revenues earned by the Canteen
Operation.
c This amount shall be from the Social Security Administration Incentive Payment Memorandum of Understanding.
d Of this amount, $3,872,506 shall be used to purchase legal services from the Department of Law and $20,746 shall be used to contract for legal services from private firms for
litigation related to the Rifle Correctional Center.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) External Capacity Subprogram
(2) Payments to House State Prisoners8
Payments to local jails at a
rate of $77.16 per inmate per
day 7,402,280 7,402,280
8,677,858 8,677,858
Payments to in-state private
prisons at a rate of $66.52 per
inmate per day9 70,298,104 67,404,718 2,893,386a
Inmate Education and Benefit
Programs at In-state Private
Prisons 541,566 541,566
78,241,950
79,517,528
a This amount shall be from the State Criminal Alien Assistance Program Cash Fund created in Section 17-1-107.5 (1), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART II
(CORRECTIONS) $1,168,428,422 $1,074,127,456 $45,982,256a $45,071,575 $3,247,135b
$1,177,079,408 $1,082,778,442
a Of this amount, $21,755,184 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1151

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1151